 He added: “We now have four-month-old diabetes-free mice, but they have had the disease.”
 Dr. Ehud Shapiro, a professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, and a professor in the Clinical and Scientific Department of the Canadian Diabetes Association, cautions that the study is still in its early stages.
 Like other experts, he is skeptical about whether diabetes can be cured. He points out that these findings are not relevant to people who already have Type 1 diabetes.
 On Monday, Swedish Academy secretary Sara Danius told a radio program that the Academy had not been able to contact Dylan directly, and had given up trying to reach him.
 Danius said: “We are keeping our powder dry for now. I have spoken to my best co-operators by telephone and e-mail and have received very friendly replies. That is enough for now.”
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff said that when the company was first founded, he couldn't hear the doorbell ringing in his garage workshop.
 He said he made a WiFi doorbell.
 Siminov said that after he appeared on the show in 2013, the company's sales skyrocketed, and the show's producers refused to invest in the startup.
 At the end of 2017, Siminov appeared on the QVC television sales channel.
 Ring also reached a settlement with competitor ADT Security Services in a lawsuit.
 Although one experimental vaccine appears to reduce mortality from the Ebola virus, no drug has yet been clearly proven to treat existing infections.
 A “cocktail” of antibodies, called ZMapp, initially looked promising in the field, but formal studies have shown that it is not as effective in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp was used as a reference, meaning scientists used it as a baseline to compare the other three treatments.
 USA Gymnastics has expressed its support for the U.S. Olympic Committee and its strict requirements for a safe training environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the U.S. Olympic Committee's statement that rather than revoke our license, we should continue to make meaningful changes within our organization that may better serve the interests of the athletes and the sport.
 According to an independent investigation supported by USA Gymnastics, we may learn why the massive sexual abuse by Larry Nassar, which survivors bravely exposed, went undetected for so long. In addition, the organization says it will make the necessary and appropriate changes.
 USA Gymnastics and the U.S. Olympic Committee have a shared goal of ensuring the safety of gymnastics and other sports, and to allow athletes to pursue their dreams in a safe, positive and supportive environment.
 In the 1960s, Brezinski first served as an adviser to John F. Kennedy, and later worked for the Lyndon B. Johnson administration.
 During the 1976 presidential election, he provided advice on foreign policy to Carter, and then served as National Security Advisor (NSA) from 1977 to 1981.
 As national security adviser, he helped Carter manage a number of international crises, such as the 1978 Camp David Accords, the normalization of U.S.-China relations in the late 1970s, the Iran hostage crisis of 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated for many awards.
 Gosling and Stone were both nominated for Best Actor and Best Actress.
 Other nominations include Best Picture, Best Director, Best Cinematography, Best Costume Design, Best Film Editing, Best Original Score, Best Art Direction, Best Sound Editing, Best Sound Mixing, and Best Original Screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Believe" and "Circle of Life," were nominated for Best Original Song. MGM received 26 nominations, more than any other studio.
 Later on Sunday, US President Donald Trump announced via his press secretary that the US military would withdraw from Syria.
 Trump made a statement after his call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 The statement said Turkey would also take over the custody of captured Islamic State fighters; European countries have refused to repatriate them.
 This not only confirms that at least some dinosaurs had feathers—a theory that has been widely accepted—but also provides details that fossils usually cannot, such as color and three-dimensional arrangement.
 Scientists say the animal's upper feathers were brownish-black, and the lower ones were light or beetle-red.
 This discovery also helps to understand the evolution of bird feathers.
 The dinosaurs' feathers did not develop a main shaft, called a rachis, but had other feather features, such as barbs and barbules, and researchers speculate that the rachis evolved later than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers suggests they were not used for flight, but rather for thermoregulation or display. Researchers believe that while this is a young dinosaur, the sample shows mature feathers, not juvenile feathers.
 Researchers believe that while this is a young dinosaur tail, the sample shows adult feathers, not juvenile down.
 A car bomb exploded yesterday morning at the police headquarters in Gaziantep, Turkey, killing two police officers and wounding more than 20 people.
 The governor's office said 19 of the injured were police officers.
 Police said they suspected a suspected Islamic State (ISIL) militant was behind the attack.
 They found that the sun and other stars work in the same way: the activity of all the stars in a galaxy is determined entirely by their luminosity and their rotation.
 The Rossby number of a star is determined by its luminosity and its rotation rate, and is related to the stellar wind.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in terms of magnetic reversals.
 On the journey, Ishizaki encountered trouble on many occasions.
 He was kidnapped by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, escaped an arranged marriage in Nepal, and was arrested in India.
 The 802.11n standard can run on both the 2.4Ghz and 5.0Ghz frequencies.
 It can backward-compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided that the base station has dual radio.
 802.11n is much faster than its predecessors, with a maximum theoretical throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who is married with two grown children, did not make much of an impression on the storyteller, Miller.
 When asked for his opinion, Miller said, “Mike said a lot at the hearing… I was preparing at the time, so I didn’t hear what he was saying.”
 “By 2020, we will strive to significantly reduce the unit emissions of carbon dioxide per unit of GDP,” Hu said.
 He did not set a reduction figure, only saying that it would be based on China's economic output.
 Hu Jintao encouraged developing countries “not to follow the old path of polluting first and cleaning up later.”
 He added, “However, they should not be asked to shoulder obligations that go beyond their stage of development, their responsibilities and their capabilities.”
 The Iraq Survey Group submitted its report at 12 noon GMT today.
 The report warned that no one can guarantee that any action currently being taken in Iraq will stop sectarian warfare, the growing violence or the slide into chaos.
 The report opens with a call for an open debate and consensus on US policy in the Middle East.
 The report offers a scathing critique of almost every aspect of the administration's current Iraq policy and urges an immediate change of course.
 The first of the 78 recommendations in the report is to take new diplomatic action by the end of the year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile forces and to re-establish diplomatic relations with neighbouring countries.
 Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, the current senator and Argentina's first lady, announced her presidential candidacy last night in La Plata, 50 kilometers (31 miles) from Buenos Aires.
 Ms. Kirchner announced her intention to run for president at the Argentine National Theater in 2005, where she had begun her campaign for a seat in the Senate as a representative of Buenos Aires Province.
 The debate began over the controversial spending on relief and reconstruction after Hurricane Katrina; some fiscal conservatives jokingly referred to it as "Bush's New Orleans policy."
 Criticism of the reconstruction effort from the liberal side focused on the awarding of reconstruction contracts to what were seen as Washington insiders.
 Over 4 million people came to Rome for the funeral.
 For the funeral at St. Peter's Square, there were so many people that it was impossible for everyone to get in.
 Large television screens were set up in various parts of Rome for the event.
 Similar facilities are set up in many other Italian cities and in other parts of the world, particularly in Poland, to accommodate large crowds.
 Historians have criticized the FBI's past policies, which concentrated resources on cases that were easy to solve, such as car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the initiative in fiscal year 2005, and mandated that the FBI must assign 10 agents to combat child pornography.
 Robin Uthappa scored the highest individual score of the innings, taking 11 fours and 2 sixes, and winning 70 runs in just 41 balls.
 The Indian pair of Sathiyan Gnanasekaran and Rahul Desai produced a 100-run partnership.
 But after the captain lost three pillars, India scored only 36 points in the match, losing seven pillars.
 U.S. President George W. Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long trip to Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, Heng Swee Keat, and discussed trade and terrorism with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush told his audience about the prospects of Asian trade expansion.
 On Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper, after a 25-minute meeting in his office with NDP leader Jack Layton, agreed to send the government's Clean Air Act to a multi-party committee for review before second reading.
 “Layton, in a meeting with the prime minister, demanded changes to the Conservative Party’s environment bill, asking for a ‘complete rewrite’ of the Conservative Party’s environment bill.”
 Since the Commonwealth Government took over funding for the Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state and federal politicians have criticised the move as a stunt ahead of the November federal election.
 But Australian Prime Minister John Howard said the bill was only to prevent the Tasmanian government from downgrading hospital facilities by an extra A$45 million.
 The latest bulletin shows that sea level readings indicate that a tsunami has occurred. Pago Pago and the islands near Niue have precise records of tsunami activity.
 Tonga reported no major damage or casualties, but power was temporarily cut off, reportedly because the power outage prevented the Tongan authorities from receiving a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre (PTWC).
 Although the alert was lifted, 14 schools located on or near Hawaii's coastline were closed for the entire day.
 U.S. President George W. Bush expressed support for the announcement.
 "The Bush administration spokesman Gordon Johndroe said the North's commitment was "an important step towards achieving the verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula."
 Subtropical Storm Jerry formed in the Atlantic today, the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season.
 The National Hurricane Center (NHC) said that "Jerry" posed no threat to land.
 The U.S. Army Corps of Engineers estimated that 6 inches of rain could have overwhelmed the dam.
 When Hurricane Katrina hit, the water level in the Ninth Ward reached 20 feet, and the levees nearby were breached, so the water is now at waist-deep.
 At a 100-foot-wide stretch of the river, water was about to spill over the levee.
 Commons administrator Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the deletion of the article in an interview with Wikinews last month.
 "To be clear, he [Wales] lied to us from the beginning. First, he pretended to listen to us, then he directly removed the artwork."
 Due to public outrage, a policy is currently being drafted to address the sexually explicit content on the site, which has millions of media outlets with public distribution licenses.
 Most of the work was theoretical, but the purpose of the program was to simulate observations of the Andromeda Galaxy.
 The team is looking for effects that may be caused by the tides between the dark matter of galaxies and the dark matter of the Milky Way.
 Just as the Moon exerts a tidal force on Earth, causing tides, the Milky Way also exerts a tidal force on the SMC.
 Scientists can conclude that the way in which dark matter affects other dark matter is the same as ordinary matter.
 The theory suggests that most of the dark matter around a galaxy is in some kind of halo around the galaxy, made up of many small particles.
 Television reports showed white smoke pouring out of the factory.
 Local authorities warned residents near the nuclear plant to stay indoors, turn off air conditioning and not drink tap water.
 The Japanese nuclear agency said that the plant detected cesium and iodine, which are radioactive.
 Officials speculated that the containers storing the uranium fuel had ruptured and were leaking.
 Dr. Tony Muller discovered this widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis (XDR-TB) in KwaZulu-Natal, South Africa.
 In an interview, he said that this new strain "is very disturbing and worrying because it has a very high mortality rate."
 Dr. Moll believes that some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two of the patients were hospital staff.
 In a year, one infected person could infect 10 to 15 close contacts.
 However, the prevalence of extensively drug-resistant TB in the overall TB patient population appears to remain low; in South Africa, at any given time, only 6,000 of the total 330,000 people are infected.
 Both satellites, which weigh more than 1,000 pounds, were traveling at 17,500 miles per hour when they collided at an altitude of 491 miles above the Earth.
 Scientists say the explosion caused by the collision was huge.
 They are still working to determine the size of the impact and its effect on Earth.
 The U.S. Defense Department's Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the mapping analysis will be published on the Internet.
 Ohio authorities said Wednesday that a doctor whose mother's body was found in the trunk of his car in Pennsylvania will face a charge of aggravated murder.
 Dr Malar Balasubramanian, 29, was found in the suburb of Breuers, about 15 miles north of Cincinnati, Ohio, wearing a T-shirt and underwear, lying on the ground by the side of the road, and appeared to have taken a large amount of drugs.
 She instructed the officers to check her black Cadillac "passion" car, which was parked 500 feet away.
 There they found the body of 53-year-old Saroja Balasubramaniam, covered in bloodstains.
 Police said the body had been there for a day or so.
 The first cases of the season were reported in late July.
 The pigs carry the disease and then transmit it to humans through mosquitoes.
 The outbreak prompted the Indian government to take some measures, such as placing traps in heavily infected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying insecticides.
 The government also promised to provide millions of doses of the vaccine, which will help health care providers prepare for next year.
 Lack of funding and the low priority of the disease compared with other illnesses have delayed plans to deliver vaccines to the worst-hit areas of the country this year.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden. Three years later he began working at the Swedish Post Office as chief stamp designer.
 He has created more than 1000 stamps for Sweden and 28 other countries/regions.
 His work is highly recognizable, with high quality and rich detail, which also makes him one of the very few “household names” in the philatelic community. Some people collect his work exclusively.
 “His 1000th stamp in 2000 was based on a painting by David Klöcker Ehrenstrahl of the Swedish King’s Great Feat, and was therefore included in the Guinness Book of World Records.”
 He has also been involved in the design of many national banknotes, most recently the Prime Minister's portrait on the new $5 and $100 Canadian banknotes.
 After the accident, Gibson was taken to hospital, but died soon after.
 The 64-year-old truck driver was not injured in the accident.
 The vehicle was removed from the scene at about 12:00 GMT.
 A worker standing in a nearby garage said: “The children were waiting to cross the road and were crying and screaming.”
 They all ran back from where the accident had happened.
 Other agenda items at the Bali conference included saving the world's remaining forests and sharing technology to help developing countries grow in ways that are less polluting.
 The United Nations also wants to eventually establish a fund to help affected countries deal with the effects of global warming.
 These funds could be used to build flood-resistant houses, improve water management and promote crop diversification.
 Furluk wrote that some people try to suppress women's voices on women's health issues, but the gods have other plans.
 She came to this conclusion because she received many positive and encouraging messages from individuals, both male and female, who argued that contraceptives should be considered a medical necessity.
 After the injured were taken to the hospital, the fight was over, and the remaining 40 prisoners refused to go back to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to turn the situation around, but the prisoners' demands were not clear.
 In the mountains, inmates set a fire between 10 p.m. and 11 p.m.
 Soon, riot police entered the yard and used tear gas to corner the prisoners.
 Firefighters finally extinguished the blaze at 11:35 p.m.
 After the dam was built in 1963, seasonal floods were controlled and sediment was no longer carried down the river.
 These sediments are necessary for the formation of sandbars and beaches, which are habitats for wildlife.
 As a result, two species became extinct, and two more became endangered, including the Bowfin.
 Although the water level will only rise a few feet after the flood, officials hope it will be enough to restore the eroded sandbars downstream.
 There is no tsunami warning issued yet. According to the Geological Agency in Jakarta, there is no tsunami warning issued because the earthquake did not reach 6.5 magnitude.
 Although there is no threat of a tsunami, local residents are feeling uneasy and are rushing to close their businesses and leave their homes.
 Although Winfrey was tearful at the farewell, she made it clear to her fans that she would be back.
 “This is not a farewell. This is a beginning of another chapter.”
 The final results of Namibia's presidential and parliamentary elections indicate that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba has been re-elected by a large margin.
 The ruling South West Africa People's Organization (SWAPO) also retained its majority in the National Assembly.
 Allied and Afghan forces entered the area to secure the position, while other allied aircraft were also sent to support them.
 The plane crashed in a high mountainous area, and was said to have been caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site was hampered by bad weather and terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organization said it was the worst outbreak in the country’s history.
 Richard Veerman, a spokesman for Médecins Sans Frontières, said: “Angola is facing the worst epidemic in its history, and the situation on the ground is still very bad.”
 The match started at 10 a.m. The weather was good, with a drizzle in the morning, but it soon cleared up. The weather was perfect for seven-a-side rugby.
 The hosts South Africa started well, beating Zambia 26-00.
 In the match against the Southern sisters, South Africa looked a bit rusty, but as the match progressed, South Africa's performance steadily improved.
 They stand out for their strict defensive discipline, ball control and excellent teamwork. It is clear that this is a team that is unbeatable.
 Officials from the city of Amsterdam and the Anne Frank Museum said the tree was infected with a fungus and posed a threat to public health because it was said to be in danger of falling at any time.
 It was due to be cut down on Tuesday, but was spared after an emergency court ruling.
 All cave entrances (these caves are called the "Seven Sisters") are at least 100 to 250 meters (328 to 820 feet) in diameter.
 Infrared images show that the day-night temperature changes indicate that these areas are likely to be caves.
 “They are cooler than the surrounding surface by day and warmer at night.
 “Their thermal behavior is not as stable as the large caverns on Earth, which tend to stay fairly constant in temperature, but they are similar to the conditions in deep underground,” said Glen Cushing, of the USGS Space Geology Team and Northern Arizona University.
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: voters go into a little booth, put a pre-printed paper with the names of the candidates they have chosen into an envelope.
 After officials verify voters' identities, voters drop their envelopes into ballot boxes and sign their names on the ballot papers.
 French electoral law sets out a very strict procedure for elections.
 Since 1988, the ballot box has had to be transparent so that voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes in the box when voting begins, and that no one other than the eligible voters deposit envelopes in the box.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe every step of the election process, and in the evening, volunteers, under strict supervision, count the votes according to a specific procedure.
 Earlier than the global release of Asus Eee PC personal notebook, because of cost savings and functionality factors, became the most talked about in Taipei IT news in 2007.
 But with ASUS winning the 2007 Taiwan Sustainable Development Award from the Taiwanese government, the laptop market will see a fundamental change.
 According to the radio station's website, the show is a "brand new, high-octane, geeky radio drama!"
 Early in its run, the show was only broadcast on the long-running Internet radio station TogiNet Radio, a talk radio-focused site.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Radio as a sub-station.
 The show initially featured amateur voice actors, ranging from local to East Texas.
 Reportedly, the large-scale robbery on the streets of Bishkek continued for a night, with law enforcement officers not present.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a “state of anarchy,” with crowds roaming the streets and looting shops for consumer goods.
 Several Bishkek residents blamed the protesters from the south for the lawlessness.
 In the Rugby Union Tri-Nations match at the Royal Bafokeng Sports Palace in Rustenburg, South Africa defeated the All Blacks (New Zealand).
 The final result was a one-point victory, 21-20, ending the all-black team's 15-game winning streak.
 The Jumping Deer team ended with five consecutive defeats.
 The all-black team had already won the cup two weeks earlier, and this was their last game.
 The final match of the series will be held next week at Ellis Park in Johannesburg, when the Springboks will play Australia.
 A strong earthquake struck western Montana late Monday night.
 The US Geological Survey (USGS) and the United States Geological Survey (USGS) have not yet received any immediate reports of damage from the earthquake.
 The epicenter of the quake was 20 kilometers (15 miles) northeast of Dillon and 65 kilometers (40 miles) south of Butte.
 On Monday, a dead duck was found in a swamp near Lyon, in eastern France, and tests confirmed that it was infected with the H5N1 strain of avian flu, which is deadly to humans.
 After Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, France is the seventh EU country to be hit hard by the virus.
 The suspected H5N1 cases in Croatia and Denmark have not been confirmed.
 Chambers had sued God, saying he was responsible for “death, destruction and terror” seen “all over the world by billions of people.”
 Cunningham is a skeptic, and he believes his lawsuit was “arbitrary,” “anyone could sue anyone.”
 The French opera by Camille Saint-Saens tells the story of an artist who "was addicted to drugs and obsessed with Japan".
 The result was that the actors smoked marijuana on stage, and the theater itself encouraged the audience to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas Gov. Rick Perry and Rep. Michele Bachmann were the top three.
 After the results came out, King praised Santorum, but harshly criticized Romney, who ran ads against King in Iowa on behalf of Santorum.
 Perry said he would "return to Texas to assess the results of tonight's debate and determine whether there is a path forward for me in this race." But he later said he would continue in the race and participate in the South Carolina primary on Jan. 21.
 In August, Bachman decided to withdraw from the race after a simulation of the election in Emmetsburg.
 The photographer was taken to the Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center in Los Angeles, where he died.
 He was reportedly in his 20s. Bieber released a statement saying, "While I was not there and do not have any direct experience of the tragedy, my heart goes out to the families of the victims and I pray for them all."
 TMZ learned the photographer pulled over on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard to start shooting the stop, and continued taking pictures after he crossed the street, prompting California Highway Patrol officers conducting the traffic stop to stop their work twice and order him to return to the other side.
 According to police, the driver of the car that hit the photographer may not face criminal charges.
 With only eighteen medals awarded per day, many athletes were unable to reach the podium.
 The medal-less athletes included Dutch skater Anouk van der Weijden, who finished ninth in the women's 1,500-meter super-combined race, and Finland's Katja Seizinger, who was 10th in the same race.
 Australian Michelle Goolagong finished 11th in the women's standing super twist and Czech Odrich Jelinkova finished 16th in the women's sitting super twist.
 Mexican gymnast Laila Ferraz placed 15th in the men's floor exercise. New Zealand gymnast Adam Hol was 9th in the men's floor exercise.
 Polish blind skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska finished 13th in the super-G, while South Korean skier Jong Seork Park finished 24th in the men's sitting super-G.
 UN peacekeepers arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, and were blamed for the outbreak, which started near their base.
 The court documents show that the United Nations camp failed to properly dispose of waste, which led to bacteria entering the tributary of the Artibonite River, one of Haiti's largest rivers.
 Haiti had not had a problem with the disease since the early 19th century, before the arrival of the military.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cites independent research that suggests that Nepalese UN peacekeepers brought the disease to Haiti without knowing it.
 United Nations experts studying the disease, Danielle Lantagne, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patients at Howard University Hospital were stable.
 The patient had travelled to Nigeria, where several cases of the Ebola virus had been reported.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating patients from others to prevent infection.
 Before appearing on The Simpsons, Simmons had worked in several other shows.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows such as Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracey Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he created The Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and hired the show's first writing staff.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties each season.
 Earlier, the Chinese state-run news agency Xinhua reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 The plane was then reportedly threatened by a bomb and forced to return to Afghanistan and land in Kandahar.
 Earlier reports said the plane had been turned away from an emergency landing in Urumqi and returned to Afghanistan.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where both civilian and military aircraft are old and poorly maintained.
 Under international sanctions, Iran cannot buy new planes.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, an Iranian plane crashed en route to Armenia, killing all 168 people on board, the country's worst air disaster in years.
 The same month, another plane crashed off the runway in Mashhad, crashed into a wall and killed 17 people.
 Airbourne have cancelled the remaining dates of their tour.
 The band was scheduled to tour the United States and Canada until September 16.
 Frontman Stephen Tyler fell off the stage during a performance on August 5, and the band subsequently canceled the tour.
 Both players held serve in their respective service games, and then Murray lost the first set in a tie-break.
 Del Potro took the lead early in the second set, but the match went to a tiebreaker after the score reached 6-6.
 At this point, Porter received treatment on his shoulder, but still insisted on continuing the match.
 The show began at 8:30 pm local time (15.00 UTC).
 Renowned singers from all over the country sing devotional songs in praise of Shri Shyam.
 The evening was opened by singer Sanju Sharma, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also performed the chhappan bhog prayer song. Singer Raju Khandelwal performed with him.
 Then, Rakesh Singh led the singing of the Vajra song.
 108 plates of Chhappan Bhog (in Hinduism, Chhappan Bhog refers to the 56 different foods offered to the deities, which include sweets, fruits, nuts, vegetables, etc.) were offered to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also introduced the chhappan bhog bhajan. Singer Raju Khandelwal accompanied him.
 At the Tokyo Game Show on Thursday, Nintendo president Tatsumi Kimishima unveiled the design of the company's next-generation Nintendo Revolution game console controller.
 The controller is similar to a television remote control, using two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 It allows players to control the movement and operation of electronic games by moving devices in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car and retired shortly after the start of the race.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso was in the lead for most of the race, but retired after a pit stop, probably because his right front wheel was too badly packed.
 Michael Schumacher withdrew from the race shortly after Alonso's retirement, because in several races the suspension was damaged.
 According to the transcript of the news conference, he said: “She’s cute and she sings well.”
 “Every time we rehearse this performance, I am moved, deeply moved.”
 About three minutes after launch, the camera showed a large amount of insulation foam debris falling away from the fuel tank.
 However, these bubbles were not thought to have caused any damage to the space shuttle.
 NASA's space shuttle program manager N. Wayne Hale Jr. said the foam fell off "after the length of time we were concerned about."
 Five minutes into the performance, the wind picked up, and about a minute later, it was blowing at 70 km/h… Then it started to rain, and the rain was so heavy that it stung the skin like needles, and then hail fell from the sky, and the panicked crowd scattered and ran away.
 “My sister and her friend disappeared, and there were two disabled people in wheelchairs on the road, so someone jumped over to help them,” Alm van Vugt said.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was operating normally.
 TEPCO reported that the Shihori nuclear power plant's No. 1 and No. 2 reactors had been shut down, and that the quake had not caused any damage.
 About 9,400 households in the area reportedly have no water, and about 100 have no electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and rail services in affected areas were suspended, with Ishikawa's Noto Airport still closed.
 A bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Within two hours, three bombs exploded near government buildings.
 Some reports say the official death toll was eight, while up to 30 people were injured, according to official reports, but the final number has not been confirmed.
 Urine samples from pets that died after eating contaminated pet food contained cyanide and melamine.
 Researchers at the university said the crystals formed by the interaction of the two compounds could cause kidney damage.
 Researchers observed that crystals formed in the urine of cats after adding melamine and cyanuric acid.
 By comparing the infrared spectra of the crystals, they found that the composition of the crystals matched the composition of crystals found in the urine of affected animals.
 I don't know if you're aware of it, but most of the goods that come into this country from Central America are duty-free.
 Yet 80 percent of our goods are subject to tariffs in Central American countries. … We treat you.
 I think this is unjustified; it is clearly unfair.
 I told them, 'How you treat me, I will treat you.'
 California Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill banning the sale or rental of violent video games to minors.
 The law requires that violent video games sold in California be labeled with a "18" rating, and that retailers be fined $1,000 for each violation of selling to a minor.
 Attorney General and Queen's Counsel Kier Starmer made the announcement this morning, saying that Hoon and Pleeth would be prosecuted.
 Hoon has resigned and his cabinet post will be taken over by MP Ed Davey, while MP Norman Lamb is expected to take over as business secretary.
 Hoon and Preece are due to appear in Westminster Magistrates' Court on February 16.
 The victims were 25-year-old Nicholas Alden and 21-year-old Zachary Cuddeback, who was driving the car at the time.
 Edgar Veguilla's arms and neck were injured, while Kristoffer Schneider needed a facial reconstruction.
 Uka's weapon jammed when it was pointed at the fifth man's head. Schneider was in agony, with one eye blinded and a piece of his skull missing, which was reconstructed with titanium plates.
 Schneider testified via video link from his home in the United States Air Force base in the United States.
 In addition to the competition on Wednesday, Carpanedo also participated in two individual competitions in the championship.
 Her first event was the ski jump, and she finished the competition with an "unfinished" result, one of 36 competitors out of 116.
 Her other competition was the all-around, where she placed tenth with a total score of 4:41.30, 2:11.60 behind the first-place Austrian Claudia Rosch and 1:09.02 behind the ninth-place Hungarian Gábor Dani.
 The four skiers in the women's sitting event failed to finish, and 45 of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom failed to make the cut.
 The central police force recovered the stolen laptop and mobile phones.
 Deputy Inspector General D K Arya said: “We have arrested five people who raped the Swiss woman and have recovered her mobile phone and laptop.”
 The names of the accused were Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 Police chief Chandra Shekhar Soren said the accused had covered their faces when they appeared in court.
 Although the car hit the house, there were three people inside, but no one was injured.
 However, the driver's head was severely injured.
 The road was closed for the time being, and emergency rescue personnel pulled the driver out of the red Audi TT.
 He was initially taken to James Paget Hospital in Great Yarmouth for treatment.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's Hospital in Cambridge.
 Adcock was subsequently charged with the murder of her son and appeared at Edinburgh Sheriff Court.
 She was detained, awaiting trial and sentencing; but any witness testimony could have been negatively affected, as her image had been widely circulated.
 This is common practice elsewhere in the UK, but the Scottish legal system is different, and the court believed that publishing the pictures could cause potential harm.
 Pamela Ferguson, a professor at the University of Dundee, said: “There does seem to be a danger if journalists publish information such as photographs of suspects.
 The Crown Prosecution Service, the main prosecuting authority, told journalists that it would not be making any further comment until at least the indictment was issued.
 The document is expected to refer to the border dispute, with Palestine hoping to base its borders on those of 1967, before the Middle East war.
 Other topics reportedly discussed included the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel has demanded that the agreement deploy a military force for 10 years in the central valley, while the Palestinian National Authority has agreed to keep it for five years.
 Foresters closely monitor the shooters who participate in supplemental insect control trials because the trials are monitored and their effectiveness is evaluated.
 In a partnership between the NPWS and the NSW Shooters Association, the Shooters Association recruited qualified volunteers for the hunting program.
 Mick O’Flynn, acting chief of the National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS) Protection and Heritage Management, said: “The four shooters selected to participate in the first shooting operation have all received comprehensive safety and training guidance.
 Yesterday, Martelly was sworn in to a nine-member Provisional Electoral Council (CEP).
 This is the fifth time that Martelly has been selected by the Haitian Provisional Electoral Council (CEP) in four years.
 Last month, the presidential council recommended the resignation of the former CEP, as part of a push to move the country toward new elections.
 The commission was Martelly's response to the large-scale anti-government protests that began in October.
 Since 2011, protests have erupted over the failure to hold elections on time, sometimes escalating into violent incidents.
 About 60 iPods were reported to have malfunctioned, overheated, and caused six fires, resulting in four minor burns.
 Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) said it had noted 27 incidents related to the device.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported 34 more cases of overheating to the ministry, though the company said the incidents were "not serious."
 The Economic Development Ministry responded that Apple's delay in releasing the report was "very regrettable."
 The Mariana Islands were hit by an earthquake at 7:19 a.m. local time (9:19 p.m. GMT on Thursday).
 The Northern Mariana Islands Office of Disaster Management said there were no reported damage to the islands.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said it had not detected any tsunami signals.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tour bus in the capital Manila and took the Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza pointed his M16 rifle at the tourists.
 Several hostages were rescued, and at least six hostages were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, and the Filipino photographers were released early.
 The two photographers then took over for an elderly woman who needed to use the bathroom, and Mendoza was killed.
 Liggins followed in her father's footsteps, beginning her career as a doctor.
 He trained as an obstetrician and began working at Auckland's National Women's Hospital in 1959.
 While working at the hospital, Liggins began to study premature babies in her spare time.
 His research showed that the application of hormones can accelerate the maturation of the baby's lungs.
 The government investigators found two "black boxes" on Wednesday.
 Other wrestlers also paid tribute to Luna.
 Tommy said, "Ronnie was the first queen of queens, my first manager. She passed away on the night of the full moon. It was a night like her. She was a strong woman."
 Dustin Runnels, aka Goldust, commented, “Luna and I are both a little bit of a mystery… She might be even more of a mystery… I love her, I think about her… I hope she’s in a better place.”
 A poll of 1,400 voters conducted before the 2010 federal election found that opposition to Australia becoming a republic had grown by 8 per cent since 2008.
 Caretaker Prime Minister Julia Gillard, during the 2010 federal election campaign, stated that she believed Australia should become a republic after the Queen's Elizabeth II's abdication.
 34% of respondents agreed that Queen Elizabeth II should be the last monarch of Australia.
 The poll showed a two-sided split, with 29 per cent of respondents saying Australia should become a republic as soon as possible, and 31 per cent saying it should never become a republic.
 The Olympic gold medallist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200 metres freestyle and three relay events at the Commonwealth Games, but his complaints about his health have been questioned.
 He was unable to take pain medication because the competition prohibits competitors from taking such medication.
 Curtis Cooper, a mathematician and computer scientist at the University of Central Missouri, discovered the largest known prime number to date on January 25.
 Early in February, a few people validated the discovery with different hardware and software, and announced it on Tuesday.
 Comets may have been the source of water and organic material on Earth, which could have formed proteins and sustained life.
 Scientists want to know how planets form, especially the Earth, since the last time a comet hit the planet was a long time ago.
 The 53-year-old Cuomo has been governor since early this year and signed a bill legalizing same-sex marriage last month.
 He called the rumors “political nonsense and stupidity.”
 He is expected to run for president in 2016.
 The Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) says NextGen can make planes fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite technology rather than the old ground-based radar technology, which allows air traffic controllers to locate aircraft more accurately and provide pilots with more accurate information.
 There are no additional transport options, no stopping at Wembley, and no parking or interchange facilities.
 Fearing a lack of transportation, the competition may have been forced to take place without the support of the teams.
 On Thursday, a study published in the journal Science said a new bird species has formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from Princeton University in the United States and Uppsala University in Sweden report that, because of the local endemic Darwin's finch and the introduced cactus wren, the new species has only evolved for two generations, despite the fact that the process is thought to take longer.
 Gold can be worked into various shapes. It can be twisted into tiny shapes.
 It can be drawn into thin strands, used for wrapping and braiding. It can also be pounded or ground into flakes.
 It can be made very thin, sticking to other metals, and because of its thinness, it can sometimes be used to decorate hand-painted pictures in books called "illuminated manuscripts".
 This is called the pH value of the chemical. You can use red cabbage juice to make a pH indicator.
 The color of the beet juice will change depending on the acidity of the chemical.
 The pH value is a measure of the number of hydrogen ions in the chemical being tested.
 Hydrogen ions are protons that have lost an electron (since hydrogen atoms are made up of one proton and one electron).
 Stir the two powders together, then use a clean, wet hand to knead them into a ball.
 The water on your hand will react with the outer layer, creating a sort of shell that feels interesting.
 Harappa and Mohenjo-daro, both cities, had flush toilets in almost every home, connected to elaborate sewage systems.
 The remains of sewage systems have been found in houses on the Greek island of Crete and in the city of Minoan Knossos.
 Egypt, Persia and China also had toilets. In Roman civilization, toilets were always part of public baths, which were mixed for men and women.
 You use satellites to call people who are far away.
 Satellites in space receive the call and almost instantly reflect it back to Earth.
 Satellites are launched into space by rockets. Scientists use telescopes in space because the Earth's atmosphere distorts some light and vision.
 To get a satellite or a telescope into space, you need a giant rocket that is more than 100 feet tall.
 The wheel has changed the world in unimaginable ways. The greatest contribution of the wheel to us is that it has made our transportation more convenient.
 Without it, we would not have trains, cars, and many other forms of transportation.
 Below them are more medium-sized cats, which eat medium-sized prey, from rabbits to antelopes.
 Ultimately, many small carnivores (including domestic cats) eat a much larger variety of prey, including insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 Their secret to success is the lek concept, where each cat is responsible for a particular task, preventing them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of the cats, living in groups called prides.
 A pride consists of one to three adult males, and up to thirty females and cubs.
 As sisters and daughters in a large family, females are usually close to each other.
 The behavior of the pride is very similar to that of a wolf or dog pack. These animals behave in a way that is surprisingly similar to lions (but not to other large cats) and that is also very deadly to their prey.
 Tigers are all-round athletes, capable of climbing (albeit not very well), swimming, jumping and pulling with a force five times that of the strongest human.
 Tigers, lions, leopards, and jaguars belong to the same family (the cat family). These four big cats are the only cats that roar.
 The roar of the tiger is not as deep as that of the lion, but more like a sentence of angry growling.
 Cheetahs like to eat small animals. If conditions allow, they will catch monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds. The cheetah's prey is almost always much smaller than the cheetah itself.
 Scientists believe that jaguars track and hunt their prey by smell and by sniffing out their footprints on the ground.
 They have excellent night vision, and can see very well in the dark. They are also very stealthy, and stalk their prey before pouncing.
 When a small group of organisms (a small population) becomes separated from their original main population (for example, they cross a mountain range or river, or they end up on a new island where they can't easily get back) they often find that their environment is different from what it was before.
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new populations will need different traits or adaptations to become a strong competitor, rather than what they needed before.
 The original population has not changed, and it still needs to adapt to the environment as before.
 Over time, new populations began to adapt to new environments, and they began to look more and more different from other populations.
 After thousands or even millions of years, the two populations would eventually look so different that they could no longer be called the same species.
 We call this process “speciation,” the formation of new species. Speciation is the inevitable result of evolution, and it is a crucial part of evolution.
 Plants can make oxygen that humans breathe and absorb carbon dioxide that humans exhale.
 Plants get their nutrients from the sunlight through photosynthesis, and they also provide shade.
 We build houses with plants. We make clothes with plants. Most of the food we eat comes from plants. Without plants, animals cannot survive.
 The Qilin was the top predator of that era, and it was not afraid of anything except other Qilin.
 Its long lower jaw is lined with more than 70 razor-sharp teeth, and its upper jaw has a row of teeth as well. This means that anything that comes in contact with it has no chance of escape.
 Its tongue is probably forked, but we are not sure. Its diet includes turtles, large fish, other plesiosaurs, and even people.
 It would attack anything that entered the water; even a giant dinosaur like the Tyrannosaurus rex would not be a match for it.
 Although most of the food the Romans ate was familiar to us, they did have some strange or unusual banquet dishes, including wild boar, peacock, snails, and a rodent called the dormouse.
 Another difference is that the poor and women sit on chairs to eat, while the rich prefer to have a banquet and eat while reclining.
 Foods that were introduced to Europe from the Americas or Asia several centuries later were unlikely to have been present in the diet of the Romans.
 For example, they have no maize, tomatoes, potatoes, and cocoa, and no Roman ate chicken.
 The Babylonians built a temple for each of their gods, which they considered to be the residence of that deity.
 People would offer sacrifices to the gods, and priests would satisfy the needs of the gods through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had an open courtyard, and a closed inner sanctum that only the priests could enter.
 Some special towers are pyramidal in shape, called zig-zag temples, and were built as part of a temple complex.
 The top of the tower is a special place of God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, a house is not so important.
 The Hebrew family life was mostly spent outdoors.
 Women cooked in the courtyard; shops were open stalls in the street. They built their houses with stones.
 Canaan had no large forests, so wood was very expensive.
 The Greenlanders are a smoking minority. According to the Nordic saga Saga of Erik the Red, who was banished from Iceland for murder, sailed west and discovered land, which he named Greenland.
 But whether he found it or not, the Eskimos were already there.
 Although they are all part of the Scandinavian region, Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland have many differences in their people, kings, customs and history.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the Declaration of Independence backside will have a treasure map.
 However, this is not the case. Although the back of the document does have some writing on it, it is not a treasure map.
 The back of the Declaration of Independence reads, "Original Declaration of Independence dated 4th July 1776." The words are written upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one knows who the author was, the large parchment document (29¾ inches by 24½ inches) is said to have been rolled up when it was first written.
 So it's likely that the symbol was added as a label.
 The Normandy landings and the subsequent fighting liberated northern France, but the south remained unliberated.
 It was ruled by the “Vichy” French, who in 1940 made a peace agreement with the Germans, not to resist the invaders but to cooperate with them.
 On August 15, 1940, Allied forces entered southern France in an offensive known as Operation Dynamo.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French forces liberated southern France and turned toward Germany.
 Civilization is a single culture shared by a group of people who live together and work together (society).
 The word "civilization" comes from the Latin word "civilis" (meaning "citizen") and "civitas" (meaning "city" or "state"), which in some ways defines the scale of society.
 City-states are the forerunners of nations. Civilization-type cultures imply the passing down of knowledge, the footprints of culture remain, and culture can be fairly distributed.
 Minority cultures often disappear without a trace, and are not considered to be civilizations.
 During the Revolutionary War, the thirteen colonies initially formed a weak central government (Congress was its only component) under the Articles of Confederation.
 Congress has no power to tax, and because there is no national executive or judicial branch, Congress must rely on state governments to enforce all laws, and state governments often do not cooperate.
 It also has no power to overturn state and local taxes and tariffs.
 These amendments must be ratified by all the states, and the states are loath to cede power to the central government, so that state representatives often boycott the convention.
 The Italian national football team and the German national football team are the second most successful teams in the world, winning the World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, rugby union, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey, and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the north, where Italians compete in international competitions and the Olympic Games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 islands (the largest being Honshu), making it the seventh largest island country in the world!
 Because of the large number of islands in Japan, the country is often referred to from a geological perspective as an "archipelago".
 Western knowledge of Taiwan can be traced back to the 15th century, when European sailors passing by named the island “Formosa” (Ilha Formosa), meaning beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India Company established a base in the southwestern part of Taiwan, and began to change the aboriginal people's food production methods and hire Chinese workers to work in its rice and sugar plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing Dynasty (1644-1912) took control of the western and northern coastal areas of Taiwan, and in 1885, the Qing Empire declared the establishment of Taiwan Province.
 In 1895, after losing the Sino-Japanese War (1894-1895), the Qing government signed the Treaty of Shimonoseki, ceding sovereignty over Taiwan to Japan, which ruled Taiwan until 1945.
 The ancient city of Machu Picchu is made up of three main buildings: the Intihuatana, the Temple of the Sun and the Three Windows.
 To make the complex more accessible to visitors, most of the buildings on the edges of the complex have been rebuilt.
 By 1976, thirty percent of Machu Picchu had been restored, and restoration work continues to this day.
 For example, the most common static image photography format in the world is 35mm format, which was the dominant film size at the end of the film era.
 It is still produced today, but more importantly, its aspect ratio is now used in digital camera image sensors.
 The actual size of the 35 mm format is 36 mm wide and 24 mm high, which is a bit confusing.
 Therefore, the aspect ratio of this format (divide by 12 to get the simplest integer ratio) is 3:2.
 Many common formats (such as the APS format series) are the same or very close to this aspect ratio.
 The often-abused and derided rule of thirds is a simple guide to creating dynamic images, and it can help keep your images orderly.
 It states that the most effective position for the subject is the intersection of the lines that divide the image vertically and horizontally into thirds (see example).
 During this period in European history, the already wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was closely monitored.
 Although the languages and customs of Europe differ, Christianity has linked them together for more than a thousand years.
 From the king to the peasant, it permeates the power of the ten directions and affects every person.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's money funds are set up to do just that.
 The centralized power of the church in Rome existed for more than a thousand years, and the concentration of power and money began to raise questions about whether the church was following the tenets of its faith.
 Shortly after the outbreak of hostilities, the British began to enforce a naval blockade of Germany.
 They cut off vital military and civilian supplies. The strategy proved effective, even though the blockade violated international law, which had been established over the previous two centuries and was universally accepted under several international agreements.
 The British laid mines in international waters to prevent any ship from entering the entire area, even threatening neutral ships.
 Because the response to this strategy has been limited, Germany expects a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 In the 1920s, the prevailing attitude among most citizens was pacifist and separatist.
 After witnessing the atrocities of World War I, nations were eager to avoid a repeat.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States to accept a job with the Edison Electric Company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents in his pocket, a volume of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former employer, to Thomas Edison.
 Each period of Chinese history has its own characteristics; each period of China or each family that ruled China is a distinctive dynasty.
 Likewise, the period of small states during the succession of dynasties was a time of instability. The most famous of these was the 60-year period of the Three Kingdoms, which was between the Han and Jin dynasties.
 In these turbulent times, various warlords fought each other for the throne.
 The Three Kingdoms period was one of the bloodiest in Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for control of the luxurious palaces of Xi'an.
 There are also many social and political implications, such as the use of measurement units, the transition from autocracy to republic, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people rather than to a single ruler.
 In addition, after the revolution, the post was open to all men, which allowed the most ambitious and successful to rise to the top.
 The same goes for the military, where the rank of an officer is no longer based on seniority, but on merit.
 The French Revolution also inspired many other oppressed working classes in other countries to start their own revolutions.
 Muhammad was interested in things beyond the world of dunya. He used to go to a cave in the mountain of “Nur” (light) called “Khir” to meditate.
 The cave itself, not only survived the test of time, but also brought to life the spiritual intent of Mohammed.
 The cave is located on the top of a mountain in the north of Mecca, and is completely isolated from the outside world.
 In fact, even knowing it exists is not easy, and once inside the cave, it is completely cut off from the outside world.
 Apart from the clear blue sky and the surrounding mountains, there was nothing to be seen. In the cave, there was almost nothing to be seen or heard from the outside.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is the only one of the Seven Wonders of the Ancient World that remains largely intact.
 The Great Pyramid of Giza is a masterpiece of the Egyptians from the 3rd century BC and one of the largest pyramids built in honor of the deceased pharaohs.
 The Giza Plateau in Egypt, which includes the Great Pyramid of Giza, several smaller pyramids, several smaller tombs, a few temples, and the Sphinx, is a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
 The Great Pyramid was built to commemorate Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to commemorate Khufu's wife and family members.
 The "up bow" symbol looks like the letter V, and the "down bow" symbol looks like a nail or a square with a missing bottom.
 Upward means to start from the top of the bow, downward means to start from the bottom of the bow (where the hand holds the bow).
 The upper bow usually makes a softer sound, while the lower bow makes a stronger, more determined sound.
 Please make your own markings with a pencil, but remember that the notes you print out are musical, so they should usually be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, frightened King Louis XVI, Queen Marie Antoinette and their two children (11-year-old Marie Thérèse and 4-year-old Louis Charles), as well as the king's sister-in-law, the Duchess of Parma, were escorted by a mob of market women from Versailles back to Paris.
 They rode back to Paris in a carriage, surrounded by a crowd that shouted and threatened the king and queen.
 The mob forced the king and queen to open the windows of their carriage completely.
 In front of the terrified queen, a rioter brandished the head of a royal guard who had been killed in the palace.
 The war expenditures of the U.S. imperialists in conquering the Philippines were paid by the Filipino people themselves.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U.S. colonial regime to cover most of the expenses, and interest on bonds issued in the name of the Philippine government through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the high profits gained by the long-term exploitation of the Filipino people are the basic gains of U.S. imperialism.
 To understand the Knights Templar, one must understand the background that led to the creation of the Knights Templar.
 The period of time in which the events took place is usually called the Middle Ages, the period of European history from the 11th, 12th and 13th centuries (1000-1300 AD).
 The Middle Ages are divided into the Early Middle Ages, the High Middle Ages, and the Late Middle Ages, with the Late Middle Ages being conventionally considered to end around 1500.
 Technological determinism is a term that covers many ideas in practice, including technological determinism, technological inevitability, and a strict definition—that human destiny is driven by the back-of-the-envelope logic of scientific laws and their manifestations in technology.
 Most explanations of technological determinism include two general ideas: first, the development of technology itself is largely independent of cultural or political influences, and second, technology in turn has an inherent “influence” on society that is not constrained by social conditions.
 For example, one might say that cars will necessarily promote the development of roads.
 However, building a national road network for only a few cars is not economically feasible, so a new production method was invented to reduce the cost of owning a car.
 The high number of cars on the road also leads to a higher rate of traffic accidents, which in turn drives the development of new medical technologies to repair injuries.
 Romanticism has a strong cultural determinist color. This stems from writers such as Goethe, Fichte and Schlegel.
 In the romantic context, geography shapes the individual, and over time, geographically related customs and cultures emerge, which are far more compatible with the place in which they are located than arbitrary imposed laws.
 Just as Paris is known as the fashion capital of the modern world, Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of the European Middle Ages.
 Its reputation as a center of luxury goods began around 400 AD and lasted until around 1100 AD.
 Its position declined in the twelfth century, mainly because the Crusaders brought back goods such as silk and spices that were more valuable than those available in Byzantine markets.
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its peak between the 10th and 11th centuries and the 14th century.
 Initially, the robe was influenced by Eastern Byzantine culture.
 However, because of cultural lag, Western fashion may be 25 to 30 years behind.
 As the Middle Ages came to an end, Western Europeans developed their own styles. One of the biggest advances was the invention of buttons, which came about after the Crusades.
 Self-sufficient agriculture is the agriculture that produces only the food that is needed by the farmer and his family.
 Self-sufficient agriculture is a simple and often organic system that uses local seeds stored in the ecological zone, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques, to maximize output.
 Historically, most farmers have been self-sufficient, and in many developing countries today, this is still the case.
 The subculture brings together like-minded individuals who feel that they are being ignored by the mainstream, and it fosters a sense of belonging among them.
 Given the age, race, class, and/or gender differences among members, a subculture may be distinctive.
 What makes a culture distinctive may be language, aesthetics, religion, politics, gender, geography, or a combination of factors.
 Members of subcultures often use distinctive styles of dress, behavior, and slang to symbolically signal their membership.
 One of the most common ways to illustrate the importance of socialization is to use the case of a few unfortunate children who, because of neglect, misfortune, or deliberate mistreatment, fail to achieve socialization in the course of their development.
 Such children are called "feral children", meaning wild children. Some feral children are confined by people (usually their own parents); in some cases, the child is abandoned because the parents refuse to accept the child's mental or physical handicap.
 Before a child runs away or is abandoned, he or she may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma.
 Others are said to have been raised by animals; some live alone in the wild.
 A wolf cub raised entirely by non-human animals would behave (within the limits of its physical condition) very much like the animal, for example, showing fear or indifference towards humans.
 While project learning should make learning easier and more interesting, scaffolding takes it a step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but a way to help people who are just learning to use a new computer program or start a new project.
 Scaffolding can be done online or offline, in other words, a teacher is a form of scaffolding, just like the little helper in Microsoft Office.
 Virtual support is embedded in the software to question, prompt and explain those procedures that may be difficult for students to handle on their own.
 Children are placed in foster care for a variety of reasons, including neglect, abuse, and even extortion.
 No child should grow up in an environment without nurturing, without love, without education, but that is what happens.
 We see the foster care system as a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 The foster care system should provide all the necessities that the original family could not.
 The Internet combines elements of mass media and interpersonal communication.
 The Internet's distinctive characteristics add an extra dimension to the uses and gratifications it affords.
 For example, “learning” and “socializing” were identified as important motivations for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 In studying the audience's response to the site, Aaker and McDermott (1998) also identified “personal involvement” and “continuing relationship” as new motivational factors.
 The use of video has led to important discoveries about micro-expressions (facial movements lasting a few milliseconds).
 Specifically, it is said that by correctly reading micro-expressions, one can determine whether a person is lying.
 Oliver Sacks, in his essay “The President’s Speech,” notes that those with brain damage who cannot understand language can still accurately judge whether a speaker is being sincere.
 He even suggested that this ability to understand human behavior may be a common trait among animals, such as dogs.
 Research in the 20th century showed that there are two kinds of gene pools: apparent and latent.
 Mutations add new genetic variation, while selection removes variation from the gene pool by expressing it.
 Because of separation and recombination, variation moves back and forth between the two pools in each generation.
 In the tropical grasslands, primates have a digestive system similar to humans, and the available plant resources are not sufficient to meet the amino acid needs of primates.
 In addition, if this is not done, there are serious consequences: growth retardation, malnutrition, and ultimately death.
 The easiest plant-based resources to obtain are the leaves and legumes, but mammals like us have a hard time digesting them unless they are cooked.
 In contrast, animal foods (ants, termites, eggs) are not only easy to digest, but also provide a lot of protein, which contains all the necessary amino acids.
 In summary, if our ancestors solved the "protein problem" in the same way as the black rhinoceroses of the tropical grasslands today, we should not be surprised.
 Arousals are defined as a process whereby a person intentionally wakes up during normal sleep and falls back to sleep within a short time (10-60 minutes).
 This is easy to do by using a relatively quiet alarm clock so that you wake up without being fully awakened.
 If you find yourself resetting your alarm clock while you're asleep, put the clock on the other side of the room, forcing yourself to get out of bed to turn it off.
 Other biological-based choices include drinking a lot of liquid before bed (especially water or tea, which is known to have diuretic effects) and forcing oneself to get up to urinate.
 The degree of inner peace of a person is inversely proportional to the degree of tension in the body and mind.
 The less pressure, the more vitality. Everyone has the potential to find absolute peace and fulfillment.
 Everyone can attain the state of enlightenment, and the only thing that prevents us from doing so is our own tension and negative emotions.
 Tibetan Buddhism is based on the teachings of the Buddha, but has been expanded by the universal love of Mahayana Buddhism and the many techniques of Indian yoga.
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It includes the methods of Kundalini Yoga, meditation, and universal love.
 In Kundalini yoga, Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, mantras, and visualizations.
 The core activity of Tibetan meditation is Tantric Yoga, which involves purifying energy channels by visualizing different deities and activating chakras, thus attaining a state of enlightenment.
 Germany was the common enemy of all the nations in World War II, which facilitated cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States. As the war ended, however, institutional, procedural, and cultural differences led to a split between the two nations.
 Two years after the end of the war, former allies became enemies, and the Cold War began.
 The war lasted 40 years, with proxy armies fighting on many battlefields from Africa to Asia, including Afghanistan and Cuba.
 By 17 September 1939, the Polish front had been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize the army along the Romanian bridgehead.
 However, these plans were almost immediately abandoned, and after the invasion of eastern Poland in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Polish-Soviet Non-Aggression Pact and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties, more than 800,000 Soviet Red Army troops entered the country and set up positions in Belarus and Ukraine.
 Shipping has so far been the most effective way of transporting large numbers of people and goods across oceans.
 Traditionally, the Navy's mission is to ensure that the nation maintains the capability to transport people and goods, while disrupting the enemy's ability to transport its people and goods.
 One of the most notable modern examples is the North Atlantic campaign during World War II, when the United States attempted to cross the Atlantic to deliver personnel and supplies to help the British.
 Meanwhile, the German Navy, which was primarily composed of U-boats, attempted to intercept the convoy.
 Had the Allies failed, Germany would have probably conquered Britain, just as it conquered the rest of Europe.
 Goats appear to have been first domesticated around 10,000 years ago in the Zagros Mountains of Iran.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to domesticate them, eat and use their milk, meat, hair and skin.
 The family sheep are usually kept in flocks on the mountains or other pasture lands, usually by shepherds (mostly children or teenagers), who are similar to the more well-known shepherds. These methods of grazing are still in use today.
 Britain built truck roads as early as the 16th century.
 Although the railroad cars were made of parallel wooden planks, at the time, for the rough roads, these cars made it possible for the horses to run faster and pull more.
 Early on, railroad ties were used to fix the rails, but people gradually realized that if iron plates were placed on the rails, the rails would be more stable and effective.
 This became the common practice, but the iron plates made the wooden wheels of the chariots wear out more quickly.
 Eventually, wooden wheels were replaced by iron wheels. In 1767, the first all-iron track was introduced.
 The first known mode of transportation was walking. 2 million years ago, with the appearance of Homo Erectus, humans began to walk upright.
 Their ancestors, the southern apes, did not have the habit of standing upright.
 The foot specialization was found in fossils of southern apes between 4.2 and 3.9 million years ago, although Sahelanthropus tchadensis may have walked on two legs as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living greener, join the green movement, and even become green activists, to reduce the disasters to come to some extent.
 In many cases, this is similar to symptomatic treatment, but if we want more than a temporary solution, we should find the root of the problem and eliminate it completely.
 It is obvious that the world has changed a lot due to human scientific and technological advances, and the problem has become more serious because of overpopulation and humanity's luxurious lifestyle.
 A handwritten draft signed by Speaker of the House John Hancock and Secretary of State Charles Thomson was approved by the Continental Congress on July 4, and sent to the printer John Dunlap in Philadelphia for publication.
 In one night, 150 to 200 copies were printed, the now-famous “Dunlap broadsides.”
 On July 8, John Nixon read the document aloud for the first time in the Independence Hall courtyard.
 One of these, dated 6 July, was sent to George Washington, who read it to his troops in New York on 9 July. A copy reached London on 10 August.
 The 25 remaining Dunlap broadsides are the earliest known versions of the document, as the handwritten originals have not survived.
 Many paleontologists believe that a group of dinosaurs survived and have lived on to the present day, which is what we call “birds.”
 Many people think they are not dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But birds still have many places in common with dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws on their feet, lay eggs, and walk on their hind legs like a Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Today, almost all computers in use are based on processing information in binary code.
 Binary numbers can only take on one of two values, either 0 or 1, and these are called binary digits, or bits in computer terminology.
 Internal poisoning may not immediately manifest itself, and symptoms such as vomiting are common, so it cannot be diagnosed immediately.
 The most powerful indication of ingestion of a poison is a container that has been opened on the scene and contains drugs or household chemicals.
 Check the label on the poison for specific first aid instructions.
 Entomologists use the term "bug" to refer to this class of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity people have with the botfly, a parasitic insect that adapts to living inside humans.
 Both the parasitic wasp and the maggot are nesting insects, adapted to live in the nests or homes of their hosts.
 There are about 400,000 multiple sclerosis (MS) cases in the United States, making it the leading neurological disease of middle age.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system (comprised of the brain, spinal cord, and optic nerves).
 Research has found that women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis (MS).
 A couple may decide not to have children for their own benefit, or for the benefit of their children.
 These couples may have a plan to adopt a child.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents terminate their parental rights so that another couple can adopt the child.
 The main purpose of science is to discover the way the world works through the scientific method, which in fact provides guidance for most scientific research.
 An experiment is a test to eliminate one or more possible hypotheses, but experiments are not the only way to conduct scientific research. Asking questions and observing can also guide scientific research.
 Naturalists and philosophers were interested in classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific fields, including psychology, were accepted.
 With the decline of Greek knowledge, the West was cut off from its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Many of the physiological and behavioral rhythms that researchers observe are largely dependent on endogenous cycles and their presence.
 Periodic rhythms are not just a simple response to external cyclical signals, but are found in most organisms, including bacteria, fungi, plants and animals.
 The biological clock is a self-maintaining oscillator that will continue to run for a period of time even without external cues.
 The experiments of Hershey and Chase were the first to show that DNA is the primary carrier of genetic information.
 Hersey and Chase used bacteria or viruses to insert their own DNA into bacteria.
 They did two experiments, one to label the bacteria's DNA with radioactive phosphorous, and the other to label the bacteria's proteins with radioactive sulfur.
 Mutations can have a wide variety of effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the affected gene, and whether the affected cell is a reproductive cell.
 Only mutations in reproductive cells are passed on to children, while mutations in other cells result in cell death or cancer.
 Nature-based tourism attracts those interested in natural areas, who come to view natural scenery, including wildlife.
 On-site activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, park tours and ecosystem studies.
 For example, visiting, photographing and learning about the orangutans of Borneo.
 Every morning, people drive out of the small town to go to work, passing the places where the people they brush past every day work.
 In this dynamic traffic commute, everyone is connected to and supports the car-based transportation system in some way.
 Now, science shows that this massive carbon economy is no longer sustainable for the biosphere that has supported human evolution for the past 200 million years.
 Everyone is a part of society, and everyone uses the transportation system. And almost everyone has complaints about the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear complaints about water quality or bridge collapses of similar magnitude.
 Why are transportation systems prone to such complaints? Why do they break down every day? Are transportation engineers incompetent? Or is there a more fundamental reason?
 Traffic flow studies are concerned with the movement of drivers and vehicles between two points, and the interactions between them.
 Unfortunately, studying traffic is difficult because it is not possible to make 100 percent predictions about the behavior of drivers.
 Fortunately, the driver's behavior tends to be within a reasonable consistency range; therefore, traffic flow tends to have a certain reasonable consistency, which can be roughly expressed by mathematical methods.
 To better represent traffic flow, a relationship was established between the three main characteristics: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, design and operation of road facilities.
 Insects were the first animals to fly in the air, and their ability to fly made them more difficult for predators to catch, and more effective at finding food and mates.
 Most insects have an advantage in that they can fold their wings back along their body.
 This gives them more small surface area to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings back are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Several thousand years ago, a man named Aristarchus said that the solar system revolved around the sun.
 Some people think he was right, but many others disagree; they think the solar system revolves around the Earth, and the Sun, and even other stars.
 That seems reasonable, because the earth doesn't feel itself moving, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest river in the world, and it is the largest river in the world. It has more than eight times the volume of the second largest river.
 The Amazon River is also the widest river on Earth, with some sections as wide as 6 miles.
 The Amazon River accounts for 20% of all the fresh water flowing into the oceans.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 km (3,980 mi) long. The river's water comes from thousands of smaller tributaries.
 Although the construction of stone pyramids continued until the end of the Old Kingdom, the grand scale and sophisticated construction techniques of the Giza pyramids have never been surpassed.
 The people of the New Kingdom marveled at the monuments of their predecessors, which were more than a thousand years old.
 The population of Vatican City is about 800 people. It is the smallest independent country in the world, and also the least populated country.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its legal code and official communications.
 Italian is also the language most people in the country use on a daily basis, while Latin is used in religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholic.
 People have known about the basic chemical elements gold, silver, copper, etc. since ancient times, because these elements can be found in nature in their natural state and are relatively easy to extract using primitive tools.
 The philosopher Aristotle proposed a theory that everything is made up of one or more of the four elements of earth, water, air, and fire.
 This is more like the four states of matter (in no particular order): solid, liquid, gas and plasma, but he also proposed a theory that they can change into new matter, making up the things we see.
 Alloys are basically made of two or more metals. Don't forget that there are many elements on the periodic table.
 Calcium, potassium, and so on are metals, and silver and gold are metals, of course.
 There are also alloys with small amounts of non-metallic elements (such as carbon).
 Everything in the universe is made of matter, and all matter is made of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so small that the period at the end of this sentence could contain millions of billions of atoms.
 So when the pencil was invented, it became a favorite of many people.
 Unfortunately, with the advent of new writing methods, the pencil's position has become lower and its use has become less.
 People now write on computer screens, and never have to touch a pen.
 One can only guess what the fate of the keyboard will be when the next generation of products arrives.
 The process of creating a fission bomb works as follows: It takes energy to bring a nucleus and many protons and neutrons together.
 It's a bit like pushing a heavy little trolley up a hill, splitting the atom again, and then releasing some energy.
 Some atoms contain unstable nuclei, which means that they are likely to split without much or any stimulation.
 The surface of the Moon is made of rock and dust. The outer layer of the Moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 km thick near the surface and about 100 km thick at the far side.
 The crust beneath the dark side is thinner, while the crust beneath the highlands is thicker.
 Because the crust is thinner, the near side may have more dark material, making it easier for lava to rise to the surface.
 The core of the content theory of motivation is to find factors that are recognized or generate interest.
 These theories suggest that as people mature into adulthood, certain needs and/or desires are internalized.
 These theories study why some people want to do what they do, and what in their environment makes them do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's hierarchy of needs and Herzberg's two-factor theory.
 Generally speaking, when managers start leading former colleagues, there are two types of behavior. One is that they try to maintain a “close relationship” with team members.
 This type of manager finds it difficult to make unpopular decisions and has difficulty enforcing discipline, assessing performance, assigning responsibilities, and holding people accountable.
 In another extreme case, this person becomes a completely different individual, who feels that he/she must change everything the team is doing and take credit for the results.
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success of the team.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between the leader and other team members.
 Virtual teams need to maintain the same quality standards as traditional teams, but with a few subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as the point of contact for their corresponding in-person team.
 They often have more autonomy than traditional team members because their team may schedule meetings across different time zones, and local management may not understand this.
 The existence of the “invisible team” (Larson and LaFasto, 1989, p. 109) is also a unique component of the virtual team.
 The “invisible team” is the management team to which each member reports. It sets standards for all members.
 Why would an organization spend so much time building a learning organization? One of the goals of putting the concept of organizational learning into practice is innovation.
 When all available resources are effectively utilized among the functional departments of an organization, creativity and originality will occur.
 Therefore, an organization in the process of overcoming obstacles together often leads to new innovative processes to meet customer needs.
 Before an organization can innovate, leaders must create a culture of innovation, knowledge sharing, and organized learning.
 Angels (2006) explains the continuous improvement approach as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiological data provide physical evidence for cognitive research methods. Thus, it narrows the scope of research and makes it more accurate.
 The relationship between brain pathology and behavior can support researchers in their studies.
 We have known for a long time that different types of brain damage, injury, lesions and tumors can affect behavior and cause certain cognitive changes.
 The rise of new technologies has allowed us to see and study the structure and workings of the brain in ways that were never possible before.
 This provides us with a wealth of information and material to build a model of the brain and to understand how it works.
 Artificial intelligence has a strong science fiction flavor, but it is actually a very important branch of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning and adaptation of machines.
 Artificial intelligence (AI) research involves building machines that can perform tasks that require intelligent behavior.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and customer issues, handwriting recognition, speech and facial recognition.
 All of these became separate disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to problems in real life.
 Artificial intelligence systems are now common in the fields of economics, medicine, engineering and the military, and some home computers and video game software applications have built-in artificial intelligence systems.
 Field trips are an important part of any teaching activity. Often, teachers are happy to take students to places that are not accessible by bus.
 Virtual field trips are a high-tech solution. Students can view museum artifacts, visit aquariums, or admire fine art in the classroom.
 Sharing the field trip virtually is also a good way to review the trip and share the experience with the next class.
 For example, students at Bennet School in North Carolina design a website each year about their trip to the state capital. The website is redesigned each year, but the old versions are kept online as scrapbooks.
 Blogging can also help students improve their writing skills. Although students often begin blogging with poor grammar and spelling, the presence of readers often changes this.
 Students are often the most critical readers, so bloggers begin to work hard to improve their writing to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also “forces students to become more observant of the world around them.” To meet the audience’s interest, students are encouraged to become smart and interesting.
 Blogging is a tool that can foster collaboration and encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 "Blogging can be used to help students become better at analyzing and reasoning; by actively responding to Web-based materials, students can find their own position in the context of others' articles and can articulate their own views on specific issues" (Oravec, 2002).
 Ottawa is the capital of Canada, a vibrant bilingual city with a number of art galleries and museums that showcase the past and present of Canada.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and to the north is Muskoka River and the untouched natural beauty on the other side of the river.
 All these things make Ontario the typical Canada that foreigners think of.
 Further north, the vast expanses are sparsely inhabited, and some areas are uninhabited wilderness.
 One striking demographic contrast: the number of African Americans living in the United States is greater than the number of Canadian citizens.
 The islands of East Africa are located off the eastern coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is the largest island in the world, and for wildlife, it is a continent unto itself.
 The smaller islands are mostly independent or French overseas departments, and are known for their luxury beach resorts.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the islands, and the religion is prevalent in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 European influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorers Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape of Good Hope route from Europe to India.
 It is bordered by the Sahara Desert in the north, the Sahel in the south, and the Atlantic Ocean in the west and south.
 Women: It is recommended that all female visitors, regardless of their actual marital status, state that they are married.
 Wearing a ring will help too (but don't wear a ring that looks too expensive.
 Women should be aware that cultural differences may lead to what they perceive as harassment, and that being followed, grabbed, and so on, is not uncommon.
 When rejecting a man, be firm and don't be afraid to stand up for yourself (regardless of cultural differences, be decisive!).
 The modern city of Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merenids.
 The Portuguese destroyed the city and rebuilt it, naming it Casa Branca, until the earthquake of 1755 left it in ruins.
 The sultan of Morocco rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya. Spanish merchants established a trading base here and named it Casablanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring shopping destinations in all of Morocco.
 Shops selling Moroccan traditional goods such as tagines, pottery, leather goods, water pipes and various trinkets are common in the old city of Medina, but these are aimed at tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, located on the eastern edge of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by lava from the Nyiragongo volcano, which buried much of the town's streets, particularly the town centre.
 Although Goma is considered safe, travel to any location outside of Goma should be investigated in advance to determine whether the ongoing fighting in North Kivu has abated.
 The city is also the base for climbing Nyiragongo volcano and for the cheapest gorilla tracking in Africa.
 You can take a boda-boda (motorcycle taxi) to tour Goma. The normal (local) price for short distances is 500 Congolese francs.
 Also, because it is relatively remote, "Tibet" has come to be used as a metaphor for distant foreign lands.
 Today, although the fame of Tinbakutu has made it a tourist destination, and there is an airport, it is a poor town.
 In 1990, it was listed as a World Heritage Site in Danger due to the threat of the desert.
 This is an important stop on Henry Louis Gates's PBS series, "The African American Epic."
 The city stands out from the rest of the country because it is more Arabic than African.
 Kruger National Park (KNP) is located in northeastern South Africa, bordered by Mozambique to the east and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park covers 19,500 square kilometres and is divided into 14 different ecological zones to support different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's major tourist attractions and is considered the flagship of the South African National Parks (SANParks) system.
 Like all South African national parks, the park charges an entrance fee and a conservation levy every day.
 A Wild Card is also useful. With this card, you can enter some of South Africa's parks or all of the national parks.
 Hong Kong Island is the epitome of Hong Kong, and the focus of many tourists.
 The many buildings that make up Hong Kong's skyline are like a flashing bar chart, especially when reflected in the waters of Victoria Harbour.
 To get the best view of Hong Kong, you can leave the island and head to the beach on the other side of the harbour.
 Most of the urban development on Hong Kong Island is concentrated on reclaimed land on the north shore.
 This is where the British colonists settled, so if you want to find evidence of the colonial history of this territory, this is a good place to start.
 The Sundarbans is the largest mangrove forest in the world, stretching 80 kilometres (50 miles) from the coast to the interior of Bangladesh and India.
 The Sundarbans has been declared a World Heritage Site by UNESCO. The part of the forest in India is called the Sundarbans National Park.
 But these forests are not just mangrove swamps; they also contain the remnants of vast forests that once covered the Ganges plain.
 Sūndebils is 3,850 km² in area, of which about one-third is water/marshland.
 Since 1966, Sungei Buloh has been a wildlife sanctuary. It is estimated that there are currently 400 Royal Bengal tigers and about 30,000 deer in the park.
 Buses run all day from the Inter-City Bus Station (across the river), but most of the buses, especially those to the east and Jajarkot/Bhumtang, run between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Given the frequent fullness of the buses in the range, it is recommended to buy tickets a few days in advance.
 Most areas have comfortable, sturdy Japanese Coaster buses.
 To get to nearby places such as Paro (Nu 150) and Punakha (Nu 200), shared taxis are a quick and comfortable way to go.
 The Oyapock Bridge is a cable-stayed bridge that crosses the Oyapock River, connecting Oiapoque, Brazil, and Saint-Georges, French Guiana.
 The two towers are 83 meters high, the length of the bridge is 378 meters, and there are two 3.50-meter-wide lanes.
 The clearance under the bridge is 15 meters. The project was completed in August 2011, but it was not until March 2017 that it was opened to traffic.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational by September 2017, when the Brazilian customs checkpoint is also expected to be completed.
 The Guaraní are the most important indigenous group in the region of present-day eastern Paraguay, living a semi-nomadic hunter-gatherer lifestyle, with some agriculture.
 The Chaco region was home to other indigenous tribes such as the Guaycuru and Payagua, who lived by hunting, gathering and fishing.
 Paraguay, in the 16th century, was called the “Great Indian Province,” the result of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups that inhabited the region.
 The Spanish began a three-century-long period of colonization.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has worked to preserve the city's many native characteristics and features.
 Argentina is known for having the best polo teams and players in the world.
 The largest annual tournament is held in December at the Las Cañitas polo field.
 On other days of the year, smaller tournaments and competitions are also held here.
 For news about the tournament and how to buy tickets for the horse races, please visit the Argentine Horse Racing Association website.
 The official currency of the Falkland Islands is the Falkland Islands pound, which is equivalent to the British pound.
 Currency can be exchanged at the island's only bank, located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West shop.
 The pound sterling is generally accepted everywhere on the island, and credit cards and US dollars are often accepted in Stanley.
 Credit cards may not be accepted on the outer islands, but British and American currencies are likely to be accepted; please check with the owner in advance to confirm the method of payment accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange Falkland Islands currency outside the islands, so exchange it before you leave.
 Montevideo is located south of the equator, so in the winter in the northern hemisphere, it is summer there.
 Montevideo is in the subtropical zone; in summer months, temperatures often exceed 30°C.
 Winters may feel colder than they actually are: temperatures rarely fall below zero, but when wind and humidity combine, it can feel colder than the thermometer says.
 There is no specific “rainy season” and “dry season” here: the annual rainfall is roughly the same.
 Although many of the animals in the park are used to humans, wild animals are still wild animals, and we should not feed or disturb them.
 Park officials say that bears and wolves should be kept at least 100 yards away, and all other wildlife should be kept at least 25 yards away.
 No matter how docile they may appear, bulls, deer, moose, bears, and almost all large animals are capable of attacking humans.
 Each year, dozens of visitors are injured by not keeping a proper distance. These animals are large, wild, and potentially dangerous, so please give them some space.
 In addition, be aware that odors attract bears and other wildlife, so avoid carrying or cooking odorous foods and keep campsites clean.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is located on the island of Upolu and has a population of less than 40,000.
 Apia was founded in the 1850s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The Gulf had been the scene of a notorious naval confrontation in 1889, when seven ships from Germany, the United States and Britain refused to leave the Gulf.
 Apart from a British cruiser, all the ships sank, and nearly 200 Americans and Germans lost their lives.
 In the struggle for independence organized by the Māori sports movement, a peaceful meeting in the town resulted in the death of the paramount chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland spans two harbours, so there are plenty of beaches to choose from. The most popular beaches are spread across three areas.
 The North Shore beaches (within the North Shore District) run along the Pacific Ocean from Long Bay in the north to Devonport in the south.
 It's almost all sand, so swimming is safe, and there are plenty of shady spots with New Zealand Christmas trees.
 Tamaki Drive Beach is located on Waitemata Harbour, in the upmarket suburbs of Mission Bay and St Heliers in central Auckland.
 These beaches are sometimes crowded with vacationing families, and the shoreline is lined with all sorts of shops. Swimming is safe.
 The local beer is “Number One” beer. It is not complex, but it is very good and refreshing. Another local beer is called “Manta”.
 You can buy a lot of French wine here, but New Zealand and Australian wines are probably more travel-worthy.
 Local tap water is perfectly safe to drink, but if you are still concerned, bottled water is readily available.
 The concept of “flat white” coffee is still a bit alien to Australians. A small cup of black coffee is “espresso” and the cappuccino is a lot of foam on top of the coffee, not milk.
 Hot chocolate is the standard in Belgium. Fruit juices are expensive, but of good quality.
 There are many people who visit the Great Barrier Reef all year round, and there are very few injuries reported on the Great Barrier Reef as a result of any of the above activities.
 Nevertheless, you should follow the advice of the relevant authorities, observe all the signs and pay close attention to the safety warnings.
 Box jellyfish appear on the beaches and in the estuaries of 1770 from October to April each year, and occasionally at other times.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans. Most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The main habitat of the saltwater crocodile is not the ocean, but the mouth of the North Rockhampton River.
 Booking in advance can give travelers peace of mind, knowing that they will have a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Although travel agencies may be able to book you in a campground or other accommodation, they will usually work with specific hotels.
 Travel agencies usually offer packages that include breakfast, airport transfers, and sometimes even airfare and hotel accommodations.
 If you need time to consider the price or to get other documents (such as a visa) to go to your destination, they can hold your reservation for you.
 If any changes are needed or any requests are made, they should be made through the travel agent, not directly with the hotel.
 At some music festivals, the vast majority of attendees choose to camp on-site, and most attendees consider this to be an essential part of the festival experience.
 If you want to see the show up close, you have to get there early and stake out a spot near the stage.
 Remember, though the music on the main stage may have ended, the rest of the festival may still be playing music well into the night.
 Some music festivals have special camping areas for families with children.
 If you cross the North Sea in winter, you have to check the position of the passenger compartment, because the ice will make a very terrible noise for those who are most affected.
 St. Petersburg cruises include city sightseeing. Cruise passengers are exempt from visa requirements (please see the Terms and Conditions for details).
 Casinos are designed to keep people spending as much time and money as possible. Casinos usually have no windows or clocks, and exits are often well hidden.
 They usually provide special food, drinks, and entertainment to keep the guests happy and stay at the casino.
 Some venues provide free alcoholic beverages. However, drinking alcohol can impair one’s judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of staying sober.
 Anyone driving in high-latitude areas or crossing mountain passes should consider the possibility of encountering snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On snow-covered roads, friction is very low, and you can't drive like on a smooth asphalt road.
 In a blizzard, a short amount of time can produce enough snow to trap you.
 Snow, sleet, water droplets or ice on the windshield can also obstruct your vision.
 On the other hand, snow and ice are common in many countries, and traffic is almost never interrupted throughout the year.
 Hunting safaris are perhaps the most attractive tourist activity in Africa, and are a highlight of many tourist itineraries.
 The word “safari” in common usage refers to a land journey to view the spectacular wildlife of Africa, especially in the savannah.
 Some animals (such as elephants and giraffes) often like to get close to cars, and standard equipment can make it easier to appreciate them.
 Lions, leopards and cheetahs are sometimes afraid of people, and you can see them better with binoculars.
 Hiking (also called bushwalking, backpacking, or trekking) is primarily walking, usually for several hours or over several days.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5, 2021. Some events will be held in other parts of Japan.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to have hosted two Summer Olympics, the first in 1964.
 If you booked flights and accommodation for 2020 before the announcement, you may face a difficult situation.
 Cancellations vary, but as of the end of March, most cancellations due to the new coronavirus have not been extended beyond July 2020, the originally scheduled date of the Olympics.
 Ticket prices for most events are expected to be between 2,500 yen and 130,000 yen, with the average price being around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing damp clothes can help them to dry. Even if there is no iron and ironing board in the room, many hotels offer a laundry service.
 If you don't have an iron, or you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can try a hair dryer (if you have one).
 Be careful not to make the clothes too hot (this can cause shrinkage, and in extreme cases, can burn the clothes).
 There are many ways to purify water, and some are more effective against specific contaminants.
 In some areas, one minute is enough, in others it takes a few minutes.
 The effectiveness of filters varies, and if you are concerned about this, you should consider buying bottled water from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter animals that are not common in their home country.
 Pests can damage food, cause irritation, and in more severe cases, allergic reactions, spread toxins, or spread disease.
 Infectious diseases themselves, or those dangerous animals that can kill humans through violence, are not usually considered pests.
 Duty-free shopping is the opportunity to buy duty-free goods in a specific location.
 Travellers to countries/regions with high taxes on alcohol, tobacco and other products may save a lot of money by purchasing these items in these locations.
 The most challenging section of the Buffalo-Pittsburgh Expressway is the stretch between Point Marion and Fairmont, which frequently passes through remote and rural areas.
 If you are not used to driving on rural roads, keep your wits about you: There are steep hills, narrow lanes and sharp turns everywhere.
 The posted speed limit is significantly lower than the speed limit on the other stretches of road, and the importance of strict adherence to the speed limit is emphasized.
 Strangely, though, the cell phone service here is much better than on many other routes, such as the Pennsylvania wilderness.
 German pastries are great, but Bavarian pastries are even better, and are very similar to those of Austria, their southern neighbors.
 Fruit tarts are very common, and apples are used year-round for tarts, and cherries and apricots are available in the summer.
 Many German baked goods also feature almonds, cherries and other nuts. Popular cakes and strong coffee are often a match made in heaven.
 If you want something a bit more flavorful, try a fruit jam bun, which is called something different in different regions, such as Berliner, Pfannkuchen, or Krapfen.
 Curry is a dish of spices and herbs, with meat or vegetables.
 Curry dishes can be either “dry” or “wet,” depending on how much water is used.
 In the northern parts of India and in the interior of Pakistan, curd is often used in chutneys; in southern India and some other coastal areas of the subcontinent, coconut milk is often used.
 Indonesia has 17,000 islands, so Indonesian cuisine is a generic term that encompasses a wide variety of local cuisines.
 But without further ado, this word usually refers to food that originates from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now, the islands are full of Javanese food, with many simple dishes, and the main spices that the Javanese like are peanuts, chili, sugar (especially Javanese coconut sugar), and various spices.
 The stirrups are suspended on either side of the saddle to support the rider's feet.
 They provide better stability for the rider, but also have safety hazards, as the rider's feet can get caught.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse but has one foot caught in the stirrup, the horse may drag him along as it runs. To minimize the risk of this happening, some precautions can be taken.
 First, most horse people wear spurred boots, and the soles are smooth and narrow.
 Secondly, some saddles – especially English saddles – have safety catches, which will drop the girth straps from the saddle if the rider falls backwards.
 Chile's first choice mountain climbing destination, the Cochamó Valley, has been called the Yosemite of South America, with its variety of granite walls and cliffs.
 The mountain offers a breathtaking view from the top. Climbers from all over the world are constantly opening new routes on the vertical walls.
 Alpine skiing includes both downhill and cross-country skiing, and is a very popular sport in which the skier or snowboarder is attached to skis or a snowboard and slides down a snow-covered hillside.
 Skiing is the main tourist activity for many ski enthusiasts, who are sometimes referred to as "ski bums", who plan to spend the entire holiday skiing in one location.
 The idea of skiing goes back a long way – cave paintings of skiers have been found dating back to 5000 BC!
 As a sport, alpine skiing can be traced at least as far back as the 17th century, when Norwegians established the first recreational ski club in Australia in 1861.
 Skiing: This activity is also called backcountry skiing, ski touring or ski mountaineering.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually does not involve either of these activities. These two activities are done on steep terrain and require harder skis and boots.
 Imagine the ski trail as a hiking trail.
 In good conditions, you can go further than walking—but only in a few cases will you be able to match the speed of cross-country skiing on a flat track without a heavy pack on your back.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small size but with many independent countries, and traveling across multiple countries usually means having to go through visa applications and passport checks several times.
 However, in this respect, the Schengen area is a bit like a country.
 As long as you are staying in this area, you can usually cross the border directly without having to go through a passport checkpoint again.
 Likewise, with a Schengen visa, you do not have to apply for a visa separately to each Schengen member state, thus saving time, money and hassle.
 There is no uniform definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax agencies define an antique as anything over 100 years old.
 The definition has geographical variations, with the age limit being shorter in North America than in Europe.
 Handicrafts may be defined as antiques, even though they are much younger than mass-produced items of the same type.
 Reindeer husbandry is an important livelihood for the Sámi people, and the culture surrounding the industry is also important to many who make their living in other ways.
 However, even if we take the traditional view, not all Sámi were involved in large-scale reindeer herding, and they lived by fishing, hunting and similar activities, and often kept reindeer as draft animals.
 Many Sami people are now involved in modern industries. Tourism is a major source of income in the Sápmi region.
 Although the term “Gypsy” is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is often considered offensive because it is associated with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about Roma.
 If the country you are visiting is subject to a travel advisory, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult with recommendations from governments other than your own, but they are designed for their own citizens.
 For example, U.S. citizens in the Middle East may face different circumstances than Europeans or Arabs.
 Travel advisories can only provide a brief summary of the situation on the ground.
 Compared to the more detailed information provided elsewhere, the advice provided here tends to be more general and simplistic.
 Extreme weather is a general term for any dangerous weather event that causes damage, disruption, or loss of life.
 Severe weather can occur anywhere in the world. Severe weather comes in many different types, depending on geographic location, terrain, and atmospheric conditions.
 Hurricanes, hailstorms, excessive rainfall, wildfires, and thunderstorms, tornadoes, waterspouts, and cyclones are all manifestations and effects of extreme weather.
 Regional and seasonal severe weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and dust storms.
 Travellers are strongly advised to be aware of the severe weather risks in their location, which may affect travel plans.
 Anyone planning to go to a country that may be considered a war zone should receive professional training.
 Search the Internet for “counter-insurgency courses” and you may find the address of a local company that offers training.
 The course usually covers all the topics discussed here, and often goes into more depth with real-life examples.
 The course usually lasts 2-5 days, and will cover role-playing, first aid, and sometimes firearms training.
 Books and magazines about survival in the wild are common, but those about survival in war zones are rare.
 Travelers planning to have sex-change surgery abroad must bring valid documents when returning home.
 As for whether they want to issue passports without a gender marker (X) or to change documents to match the name and gender they want, governments are divided.
 Foreign governments also have varying degrees of recognition of these documents.
 In the post-September 11 era, security checkpoints have become more cumbersome.
 Transgender people who have not had surgery have to expose their privates when going through the scanner, and cannot guarantee their dignity.
 Offshore currents are the rapid return of waves from the beach to the sea, usually occurring at a reef or similar location.
 The underwater topography causes the currents to concentrate in a few deep areas, where they may form strong currents flowing into the deep water.
 Most deaths are caused by swimming upstream, against the current, and exhaustion.
 After getting past the rapids, it was not so difficult to get back.
 Swim to a place where you won't get stuck again, or wait for rescue (depending on your skills and whether you've been spotted).
 The shock of returning home is faster, shorter, and more intense than the cultural shock.
 For travelers who are easily adaptable to new cultures, it can be difficult to re-adapt to their home culture.
 After living abroad for a while, you will find that you have adapted to the new culture and dropped some of your home culture.
 When you first arrive, people may be very patient and understanding, because they know that travelers need time to adjust to a new country.
 People may not realize that travelers also need patience and understanding on the way back.
 For children, the sound and light show at the pyramids is one of the most interesting activities in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and before the show starts you can see them standing there in silence.
 You can usually hear the voices of tourists and street vendors here, and the sounds and lights blend together like a story being told.
 The backdrop is a lion-faced man, who is also the narrator of the long story.
 The scene is displayed on the pyramid, with different pyramids being lit up.
 The South Shetland Islands were discovered in 1819. Several countries claim sovereignty over the islands, and there are sixteen bases on the islands, the most of any archipelago.
 The islands are located 120 km north of the Antarctic Peninsula and the largest island is King George Island, where the settlement of Villa Las Estrellas is located.
 Other islands include Livinston Island and Deception Island. There, a still active volcano is covered by water, providing a spectacular natural harbor.
 Ellsworth Land is located in the southern part of the peninsula, facing the Bellingshausen Sea.
 The mountains of the peninsula here merge into the highlands, and then re-form into the 360-kilometer-long Ellsworth Mountains, which are divided by the Minnesota Glacier.
 In the north, or rather the Sentinel Range, the highest mountains of Antarctica are found, the Vinson Massif, with a peak of 4,892 metres.
 In remote areas where cell phone coverage is not available, a satellite phone may be your only option.
 Satellite phones are not a replacement for mobile phones, as they can only be used outdoors where the satellite signal is strong.
 The service is often used for shipping, including yachts, and for exploration where there is a need for long-range data and voice communications.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide you with details about connecting to this service.
 For those planning how to spend their gap year, studying abroad is becoming an increasingly popular option.
 This is particularly popular among high school graduates who can take a year off before going to college without affecting their education.
 In many cases, attending a gap year program abroad can substantially improve your chances of getting into a college back home.
 Usually, participation in these educational programs requires payment of tuition.
 Finland is a sailing paradise, with the nickname of “the thousand lakes country”, and has thousands of islands in its lakes and coastal archipelago.
 In the islands and lakes, boats are not necessary.
 The size of the coastal islands and the largest lakes are large enough to accommodate any yacht, but even smaller boats and canoes can provide a different experience.
 Boating is a national pastime in Finland, with one boat for every seven or eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand also have similar situations, but in other ways they are unique (for example, in the Netherlands, this figure is one to forty).
 Most typical Baltic cruises will spend a long time in St. Petersburg, Russia.
 This means you can have several full days to explore this historic city, then return to the ship for the night.
 If you are only going to be on a cruise ship, you do not need a separate visa (as of 2009).
 Some cruise lines advertise Berlin as a highlight of their itineraries, but as the map above shows, Berlin is not near the sea, and cruise prices do not include the cost of visiting the city.
 For people of all ages and backgrounds, flying can be a terrifying experience, especially if they have never flown before or have had a bad experience.
 This is not a bad thing: it is not unlike the fear and disgust that many people feel about other things.
 For some people, understanding how airplanes work and how they fly can help them overcome their fear of the unknown or uncontrollable.
 Courier companies can earn high wages because of the speed with which they deliver goods. Time is often of the essence for business documents, goods, or parts for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, the big companies have their own planes, but for other routes and small companies, it's a problem.
 If they use air transportation, it can take several days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The fastest way is to have it carried as baggage. According to the airline regulations, it is forbidden to carry luggage of passengers who have not boarded the plane, and you will need to be present at the time.
 The most obvious way to travel first or business class is to pay a lot of money to enjoy this privilege (or, better yet, have your company pay for it).
 However, this is not cheap: according to rough estimates, the price of a business class ticket may be 4 times higher than that of an economy class ticket, and the price of a first class ticket is even 11 times higher!
 In general, flying from A to B without stopping, there is no need to look for discounted business class or first class tickets.
 Airlines are well aware that some core customers are willing to pay a premium for the privilege of fast, comfortable travel, and they charge accordingly.
 The capital of Moldova is Chisinau, and the local language is Romanian, but Russian is also widely spoken.
 Moldova is a multi-ethnic republic, and has suffered from ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, the conflict led to the creation of the Transnistria region of Moldova, which has its own government and currency but is not recognized by any United Nations member state.
 Despite the failure of the political talks, economic ties between the two regions of Moldova were re-established.
 The main religion in Moldova is Orthodox Christianity.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, with a population of about 3.7 million, and it is Turkey's second largest port, after Istanbul, and a busy transportation hub.
 Once the ancient city of Smyrna, it is now a modern, developed and busy commercial centre surrounded by a huge bay and mountains.
 Between the broad avenues, glass-walled buildings and modern shopping centers, there are traditional red-roofed houses, 18th-century markets and ancient mosques and churches, but the city has a more Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 In Haldarsvík you can enjoy the view of the nearby island of Eysturoy. The village has a unique octagonal church.
 In the churchyard, some of the tombstones are topped with interesting marble carvings of doves.
 A half-hour stroll through this enchanting village is well worth it.
 To the north, it is easy to reach the romantic and picturesque town of Sintra, which was the inspiration for the idyllic landscapes of Lord Byron and is therefore well known to foreigners.
 Scotturb 403 buses run regularly to Sintra, stopping at the Rocha Cape.
 You can also visit the North to see the Church of Our Lady of Fatima, the place where the Virgin Mary appeared.
 Remember, you are actually visiting a huge mass grave site that has a difficult-to-quantify meaning for a large group of people in the world.
 Yet many men and women survived here, and they are still alive today; and many more of their relatives, some of whom were murdered, and some of whom worked to death, Jews and non-Jews alike.
 Please give this place the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Please do not make jokes about the Holocaust or the Nazis.
 Do not mark or graffiti on the buildings, so as not to damage the site.
 The official languages of Barcelona are Catalan and Spanish. About half of the local people prefer to speak Catalan, and the vast majority understand Catalan, while Spanish is understood by almost everyone.
 However, most of the signs are only in Catalan, as this is the first official language, as stipulated by law.
 However, public transportation and other facilities are also widely used in Spanish.
 The regular announcements on the metro are only in Catalan, but the automated system makes temporary announcements in several languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are notorious for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is usually just an inaccurate stereotype, the best way to live in Paris is to behave as well as possible and to present yourself as a person with “bien élevé” (good manners). This will make it much easier to participate in social activities.
 If you show a little basic politeness, the rudeness of the Parisians will quickly disappear.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is covered with dense forest of beech, fir and spruce, and is characterized by a combination of mountain and Mediterranean vegetation.
 The variety of microclimates, soils, and elevations makes for a rich plant life, and the area is known for its biodiversity.
 The area is also home to a variety of animals and birds.
 There you can see rare animals like the European brown bear, wolves, eagles, lynx, lynx, wild cats and turkeys, and many more common species.
 Women must wear skirts when visiting the abbey, and the skirts must be knee-length and cover the shoulders.
 Most monasteries will provide a robe for unprepared women, but if you bring your own, especially if it is brightly colored, the monks at the door will give you a wink.
 Likewise, men must wear long pants and cover their knees.
 You can also borrow from the cloakroom at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed after each use, so these dresses may feel a bit uncomfortable. All of them are the same size!
 The cuisine of Mallorca is similar to that of the Mediterranean region, based on bread, vegetables and meat (especially pork), and using olive oil exclusively.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple summer dinner: bread with olive oil, tomato, and whatever toppings you have on hand, like cheese, anchovies, or tuna.
 All nouns except those that are used to address you as “Sie” should begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is an important way to distinguish between certain verbs and their objects.
 This also makes reading easier, although it makes writing more complicated, because you need to judge whether a verb or adjective is being used as a noun.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are pronounced exactly as they are spelled.
 The main letters to pay attention to are c and g, because their pronunciation changes according to the vowel.
 Also, make sure to pronounce r and rr differently: “caro” means “beloved” and “carro” means “tank.”
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and regular.
 Therefore, reading this grammar book will help you master more Persian grammar and better understand the idioms.
 Without a doubt, if you speak a Romance language, learning Portuguese will be easier.
 However, those who know a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese is very similar to Spanish and that it is not necessary to learn it separately.
 Nowadays, most of the pre-modern observatories have been dismantled, and only a few remain as museums or educational facilities.
 Since light pollution was not as severe in its heyday, observatories were often built in urban or campus settings, making them more accessible than modern observatories.
 Most modern research telescopes are large facilities located in remote areas with good atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami, or cherry blossom viewing, has been a Japanese custom since the 8th century.
 The concept comes from China, where the peony is a popular flower.
 In Japan, the earliest cherry blossom parties were held by the emperor for himself and other members of the royal family at the Imperial Palace.
 Plants are at their best in their natural environment. So resist the temptation to pick them, even if it's "just one."
 If you are visiting a carefully landscaped garden, collecting “specimens” will also get you evicted, with no room for negotiation.
 Singapore is usually a very safe place, navigation is easy and once you arrive you can buy almost anything.
 But because you are in the “hot zone” a few degrees north of the equator, you will need to deal with both high temperatures (year-round) and strong sunlight (relatively rare when the weather is clear).
 Several buses also headed north to Hebron, the traditional burial site of the patriarchs Abraham, Isaac and Jacob and their wives.
 Please confirm that you intend to ride the bus into Hebron, and not just to the nearby Jewish settlement of Kiryat Arba.
 Inland waterways can be a good theme for a holiday.
 For example, visiting castles in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, or taking a river cruise along the Danube River to visit the charming cities along its banks.
 They also clearly marked the route for popular hiking and biking trails.
 Christmas is one of the most important Christian holidays, established to celebrate the birth of Christ.
 Many of the traditions associated with this holiday are also embraced by non-Christians in Christian countries and non-Christians around the world.
 One tradition is to stay up on Easter Eve somewhere outdoors to see the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has its Christian theological explanation, but it is very likely that it was a spring festival, a harvest festival, that existed before the birth of Christ.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter Vigils on Saturday nights during Easter weekend, with the congregation usually arriving at midnight to celebrate the resurrection of Christ.
 Initially, animals reached these islands by swimming, flying, or floating.
 Because they are far from the mainland, mammals are unable to migrate long distances, making the giant tortoise the main herbivore of the Cocos Islands.
 Humans introduced many mammals to the Galapagos Islands after their arrival, including sheep, horses, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you travel to the Arctic or Antarctic in winter, you can experience polar night, a period of time when the sun does not rise above the horizon.
 This provides an excellent opportunity to see the aurora, as the sky will be dark for at least a full day.
 These areas are sparsely populated, and there is usually no light pollution, so you can enjoy a starry sky.
 Compared to the Western-style work culture, the Japanese work culture is more hierarchical and more formal.
 A suit is the standard business attire, and colleagues refer to each other by their last names or titles.
 A harmonious workplace environment is essential, emphasizing team effort rather than individual achievement.
 Employees must get approval from their superiors before making any decision, and must unconditionally obey their instructions.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.29167696115692165, 'precisions': [0.6220754870791555, 0.354519173539665, 0.22638827187916483, 0.1494557633268211], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9924068988686431, 'length_ratio': 0.9924355810849076, 'translation_length': 24534, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 57.42176141620652, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}